Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 2. Sanitary Requirements.

§ 3.2-5105.
Definition of term “food.”

The term
“food”
as used in this article means all articles used for food, drink, confectionery or condiment, whether simple, mixed or compound, and all substances or ingredients used in the preparation thereof, intended for human consumption and introduction into commerce.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-285; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-365; 2008, c. 860.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8B M.J. Food, § 2.

§ 3.2-5106.
Sanitary conditions of food establishments.

Every place used for the preparation for sale, manufacture, packing, storage, sale, or distribution of any food shall be properly lighted, drained, plumbed, and ventilated, and shall be operated with strict regard for the purity and wholesomeness of the food produced, and with strict regard to the influence of such conditions upon the health of any worker or employee.

The floors, sidewalls, ceilings, furniture, receptacles, implements, and machinery of every place where food is manufactured, packed, stored, sold, or distributed, shall at all times be kept in a clean, healthful, and sanitary condition.

All refuse, dirt, and waste products subject to decomposition and fermentation incident to the manufacture, preparation, packing, storing, selling, and distributing of food, shall be removed from the premises daily.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-286, 3-287, 3-289; 1966, c. 702, §§ 3.1-366, 3.1-367, 3.1-369; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5107.
Plastering and painting sidewalls and ceilings; interior woodwork; floors.

Any place where food is manufactured, produced, prepared, processed, packed, or exposed shall: (i) keep its sidewalls and ceilings well plastered, wainscoted, or ceiled, preferably with metal or lumber, and shall be kept oil-painted or well limewashed; and (ii) keep all interior woodwork clean and washed with soap and water.

Every building, room, basement, or cellar occupied or used for the preparation, manufacture, packing, storage, sale, or distribution of food, shall have an impermeable floor made of cement or tile, laid in cement, brick, wood, or other suitable nonabsorbent material that can be flushed and washed clean with water.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-292 to 3-294; 1966, c. 702, §§ 3.1-372 to 3.1-374; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5108.
Sleeping arrangements.

The sleeping places for persons employed in any food establishment shall be separate and apart from the room in which food products are manufactured or stored, and no person shall sleep in any place where flour, meal, or any manufactured products thereof are manufactured or stored.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-296; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-375; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5109.
Washrooms and toilets.

Any place where food is manufactured, prepared, exposed, or offered for sale shall have a convenient washroom and toilet of sanitary construction, but such toilet shall be entirely separate and apart from any room used for the manufacture or storage of food products.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-301; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-380; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5110.
Daily cleaning of instruments and machinery.

All trucks, trays, boxes, baskets, buckets, and other receptacles, chutes, platforms, racks, tables, shelves, and all knives, saws, cleavers, and other utensils and machinery used in moving, handling, cutting, chopping, mixing, canning, and any other process, shall be thoroughly cleaned daily.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-290; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-370; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5111.
Food protected from flies, dust, and dirt.

Food in the process of manufacture, preparation, packing, storing, sale, or distribution, shall be protected from flies, dust, dirt, and all other foreign or injurious contamination.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-288; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-368; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5112.
Clothing of employees.

The clothing of any worker or employee shall be clean.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-291; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-371; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5113.
Employees with contagious or infectious disease.

No employer shall knowingly permit or require any person to work in any place where food is manufactured, produced, prepared, processed, packed, or exposed, who is afflicted with any contagious or infectious disease, or with any skin disease.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-298; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-377; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5114.
Smoking.

Smoking is prohibited in workrooms of food-producing establishments.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-300; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-379; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5115.
Animals.

No animal shall be permitted in any area used for the manufacture or storage of food products. A guard or guide animal may be allowed in some areas if the presence of the animal is unlikely to result in contamination of food, food contact surfaces, or food packaging materials. Additionally, a dog may be allowed within a designated area inside or on the premises of, except in any area used for the manufacture of food products, a distillery, winery, farm winery, brewery, or limited brewery licensed pursuant to §

4.1-206.1

.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-297; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-376; 1997, c. 122; 2008, c. 860; 2018, c. 819; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 7 provides: “That any farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery that, prior to July 1, 2016, (i) holds a valid license granted by the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Board) in accordance with Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia and (ii) is in compliance with the local zoning ordinance as an agricultural district or classification or as otherwise permitted by a locality for farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery use shall be allowed to continue such use as provided in
§

15.2-2307

of the Code of Virginia, notwithstanding (a) the provisions of
§

4.1-206.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, or (b) a subsequent change in ownership of the farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery on or after July 1, 2016, whether by transfer, acquisition, inheritance, or other means. Any such farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016, may expand any existing building or structure and the uses thereof so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. Any such farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016, may construct a new building or structure so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. All such licensees shall comply with the requirements of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia and Board regulations for renewal of such license or the issuance of a new license in the event of a change in ownership of the farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery on or after July 1, 2016.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 819 added the third sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114, effective January 1, 2022, are identical, and substituted “distillery, winery, farm winery, brewery, or limited brewery licensed pursuant to §

4.1-206

.1” for “distillery licensed pursuant to §

4.1-206

, a winery or farm winery licensed pursuant to §

4.1-207

, or a brewery, or farm brewery licensed pursuant to §

4.1-208

” in the last sentence.

§ 3.2-5116.
Metal beverage containers with detachable metal pull tabs.

It is unlawful for any person to sell or offer for sale at retail within the Commonwealth any metal beverage container or any composite beverage container designed and constructed with an all metal pull tab opening device that detaches from the container when the container is opened in a manner normally used to empty the contents of the container. For the purpose of this section, the term “beverage” shall mean beer as defined in §

4.1-100

, or other malt beverages and mineral waters, soda water and formulated soft drinks, with or without carbonation.

History.

1976, c. 774, § 3.1-382.1; 1979, c. 358; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5117.
Penalty for violation; misdemeanor.

Any person violating any of the provisions of §§

3.2-5106

through

3.2-5116

is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-301.1; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-381; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 3.2-5118.
Sterilization of bottles and containers.

All bottles, jugs, cans, barrels, and containers used in the packing, bottling, storage, distribution, and sale of nonalcoholic beverage and drink products shall be sterilized by one of the following methods before using:

By sterilization with boiling water or live steam; or

By soaking in a hot caustic solution that shall contain not less than three percent alkali, of which not less than 60 percent is caustic, or its equivalent in cleansing or germicidal effectiveness as such solutions are commonly used in the soaker-type washing and sterilizing equipment.If other equally efficient methods of sterilization are developed, the Commissioner may approve those methods of sterilization.

Any violation of this section is a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-302; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-382; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 3.2-5119.
Transportation or storage under unsanitary conditions; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person or any common carrier to permit unsanitary conditions to exist in the transportation or storage of an article of food intended for introduction into commerce, if the unsanitary conditions may contaminate the article of food.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this section is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

The Commissioner is empowered to enter and inspect all stores, warehouses, and any and all means or places of transportation or storage of articles of food. Any person who hinders or obstructs the Commissioner in the discharge of the authority or duty imposed upon him by the provisions of this section, is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

Whenever any article of food is transported or stored under unsanitary conditions, the proceedings for the enforcement of this section may be instituted and maintained in any county or city through which or in which such article of food has been or is so transported or stored under unsanitary conditions.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-305; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-385; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 2 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8A M.J. Express Companies, § 3.